District of Columbia statutes.
47-2604

Penalty for engaging in business without license or certificate of authority.

Any such company issuing contracts of insurance in the District of Columbia, without first having obtained license or certificate of authority from the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] so to do, shall upon conviction be subject to a fine of $100 per day for each day it shall engage in business without such license or certificate of authority. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 675, ch. 690, title II, § 2
renumbered as § 4, Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 401, 31 DCR 3974
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 2(t), 38 DCR 314
enacted Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(jj), 44 DCR 1730

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2604.
1973 Ed., § 47-1802.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: See notes to § 47-2601.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2603.